California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.   Conditionally inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed by Sections 14199.96 and 14199.97.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.92.

(a) The Medi-Cal Stability Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) All revenues, less refunds, derived from the taxes provided for in this article shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Medi-Cal Stability Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest and dividends earned on moneys in the Medi-Cal Stability Fund shall be retained in the fund and used solely for the purpose specified in subdivision (d).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code or any other law, funds deposited in the Medi-Cal Stability Fund pursuant to this article
 are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for the purpose of funding all of the following subcomponents to support the Medi-Cal program, in the following order of priority:

(1) The department’s administrative costs in an amount not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) annually.

(2) The nonfederal share of increased capitation payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans accounting for their projected tax obligation pursuant to this article for the applicable tax period or periods.

(3) The nonfederal share of the payments described in Section 14105.201.

(4) The nonfederal share of Medi-Cal managed care rates for health care services furnished to children, adults, seniors and persons with disabilities, and persons
 dually eligible for the Medi-Cal program and the federal Medicare Program, in the amount of at least two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) annually.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the funds in the Medi-Cal Stability Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.93.

(a) The department shall determine for each health plan, using the base data source, all of the following:

(1) Total cumulative enrollment for the base year.

(2) Total Medicare cumulative enrollment for the base year.

(3) Total Medi-Cal cumulative enrollment for the base year.

(4) Total plan-to-plan cumulative enrollment for the base year.

(5) Total cumulative enrollment through the Federal Employees Health Benefits Act of 1959 (Public Law 86-382) for the base year.

(6) Total other cumulative enrollment for the base year that is not otherwise counted in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the director may correct any identified material or significant error in the data, including, but not limited to, the total cumulative enrollment, Medicare cumulative enrollment, Medi-Cal cumulative enrollment, plan-to-plan cumulative enrollment, cumulative enrollment through the Federal Employees Health Benefits Act of 1959 (Public Law 86-382), and other cumulative enrollment. The director’s determination as to whether to exercise discretion under this section and any determination made by the director under this section shall not be subject to judicial review, except that a health plan may bring a writ of mandate under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure to rectify an abuse of discretion by the
 department in correcting that health plan’s data when that correction results in a greater tax amount for that health plan pursuant to Section 14199.95.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.   Conditionally inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed by Sections 14199.96 and 14199.97.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.94.

(a) A managed care organization provider tax shall be imposed on each health plan. The tax shall be imposed for the 2027, 2028, and 2029 calendar years. The tax shall be imposed for all periods within a calendar year that the tax is effective and operative as set forth in Section 14199.96.

(b) The department shall compute the annual tax for each health plan subject to the tax during each applicable calendar year pursuant to Section 14199.95.

(c) The department shall collect the tax for each health plan in quarterly installments and shall determine the amount due for each installment in the applicable tax period by dividing the total tax for a tax period by the number of
 calendar quarters in the respective tax period.

(d) The department shall not collect the tax imposed pursuant to this article until one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The director certifies in writing that the tax imposed pursuant to this article is a federally permissible health care-related tax that meets the broad-based and uniformity requirements under subdivisions (b) through (d) of Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and complies with federal hold-harmless requirements under Section 1396b(w)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 433.68(f) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department shall post the certification on its internet website and shall send a copy of the certification to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, the State Board of
 Equalization, the Department of Insurance, and the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) (A) The department receives written approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that this tax is a permissible health care-related tax in accordance with Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Within 10 business days following the date the department receives all necessary federal approvals for the tax pursuant to this article, the director shall certify in writing that federal approval has been received, and the department shall post the certification on its internet website and shall send a copy of the certification to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, the State Board of Equalization, the Department of Insurance, and the Executive
 Officer of the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) Within 30 business days following the date the director issues a certification as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or the date the department receives all necessary federal approvals for the tax pursuant to this article as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the department shall send a notice to each health plan subject to the tax that shall contain the following information:

(1) The tax due for the 2027 calendar year tax period and the estimated tax due for subsequent tax periods.

(2) The dates on which the installment tax payments are due for the 2027 calendar year tax period and the estimated dates on which the installment tax payments are due for subsequent tax periods.

(f) (1) A health plan shall pay the tax for each tax period in installments as calculated pursuant to Section 14199.95, based on a schedule developed by the department. The department shall establish the date that each tax payment is due, provided that the first tax payment shall be due no earlier than 20 calendar days following the date the department sends the notice pursuant to subdivision (e), and the tax payments shall be paid at least one month apart.

(2) A health plan shall pay the taxes that are due, if any, in the amounts and at the times set forth in the notice unless superseded by a subsequent notice issued by the department.

(g) The tax assessed pursuant to this article shall be paid by each health plan subject to the tax to the department for deposit in the Medi-Cal Stability Fund created pursuant to Section 14199.92.

(h) (1) Interest shall be assessed on an applicable health plan for any amount of the managed care organization provider taxes that are not paid on the date due at a rate of 10 percent per annum. Interest shall begin to accrue the day after the date the tax payment was due and shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Stability Fund created pursuant to Section 14199.92.

(2) If a tax payment is more than 60 days overdue, a penalty equal to the total accrued interest charge described in paragraph (1) shall also be assessed on the applicable health plan and due for each month for which the tax payment is not received after 60 days.

(i) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the director may waive a portion or all of either the interest or penalties, or both, assessed under this article if the
 director determines, in their sole discretion, that the health plan has demonstrated that imposition of the full amount of the tax pursuant to the timelines applicable under this article has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for the health plan or creates a significant financial difficulty in providing needed services to Medi-Cal members.

(2) Waiver of some or all of the interest or penalties pursuant to this subdivision shall be conditioned on the health plan’s agreement to make tax payments on an alternative schedule developed by the department that takes into account the financial situation of the health plan and the potential impact on the delivery of services to Medi-Cal members.

(j) In the event of a merger, acquisition, establishment, or any other similar transaction that results in the transfer of health plan responsibility for all countable
 enrollees under this article from a health plan to another health plan or similar entity, and that occurs at any time during which this article is operative, the resultant health plan or similar entity shall be responsible for paying the full tax amount as provided in this article that would have been the responsibility of the health plan to which that full tax amount was assessed upon the effective date of any such transaction. If a merger, acquisition, establishment, or any other similar transaction results in the transfer of health plan responsibility for only some of a health plan’s countable enrollees under this article but not all countable enrollees, the full tax amount as provided in this article shall remain the responsibility of that health plan to which that full tax amount was assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.   Conditionally inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed by Sections 14199.96 and 14199.97.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.95.

(a) (1) For each calendar year in which the managed care organization provider tax authorized by this article is in effect, the tax amount for each health plan shall be eight dollars and eighty-five cents ($8.85) per countable enrollee per month, unless modified in accordance with paragraph (2) or (3) or with subdivision (b).

(2) (A) The department may calculate and impose an alternative tax amount upon a determination by the department, in its sole discretion, that the tax amount in paragraph (1) is projected to generate revenues that are lower or materially higher than are needed to meet the goal described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14199.90.

(B) The alternative tax amount pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not be higher or lower than the tax amount in paragraph (1) by more than 10 percent for the 2027 calendar year tax period and by more than 25 percent for subsequent tax periods.

(3) (A) The department may establish taxing tiers consisting of discrete ranges of countable enrollees and may calculate and impose alternative tax amounts for these taxing tiers, but only to the extent consistent with the purposes of this article and necessary to achieve legitimate public policy goals.

(B) (i) The average of the alternative tax amounts pursuant to subparagraph (A), weighted according to the applicable number of countable enrollees, shall not exceed the limits specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(ii) The alternative tax amounts pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not result in an increase in the aggregate tax amounts projected to be collected from any health plan under this article that the department, in its sole discretion, determines is significant.

(b) The department may modify or make adjustments to any methodology, tax amount, taxing tier, or other provision specified in this article to the extent that it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure that federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized, provided the modification or adjustment does not otherwise conflict with the purposes of this article, or result in an increase in the aggregate tax amounts projected to be collected under this article that the department, in its sole discretion, determines is
 significant.

(c) (1) If the department calculates and imposes an alternative tax amount or amounts in accordance with paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) or identifies that modification or adjustment is necessary in accordance with subdivision (b), the department shall consult with affected health plans, to the extent practicable, to implement that alternative tax amount or amounts or modification or adjustment, as applicable.

(2) In the event of imposition of an alternative tax amount or amounts in accordance with paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) or a modification or adjustment made pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall notify affected health plans, the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committees on Appropriations, Budget and Fiscal Review, and Health, and the Assembly Committees on
 Appropriations, Budget, and Health within 10 business days of taking the applicable action.

(d) The department shall request approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as is necessary to implement this article. In making that request, the department may seek, as it deems necessary, a request for waiver of the broad-based requirement, waiver of the uniformity requirement, or both, pursuant to Section 433.68(e) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or a request for waiver of any other federal law or regulation necessary to implement this article.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this article by means of provider bulletins, all-plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory
 action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.   Conditionally inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed by Sections 14199.96 and 14199.97.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.96.

(a) The tax assessed under this article shall become effective and operative on January 1, 2027, or the effective date, certified in writing by the director, of federal approval if such approval is necessary, whichever occurs later. When such federal approval is necessary and is secured, the director shall post the certification of federal approval on the department’s internet website and shall send a copy of the certification to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, the State Board of Equalization, the Department of Insurance, and the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) This article, except for Section 14199.92 to the extent not in conflict with
 federal law, shall cease to be operative the first day of the calendar year beginning on or after the date the director, in consultation with the Director of Finance, determines that the tax has not met the intent as outlined in Section 14199.90 or that the tax was rejected where federal approval was necessary or found out of compliance with federal law by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the director determines that it is not feasible to modify the tax to achieve such federal approval or compliance. The director shall post the determination on the department’s internet website and shall send a copy of the determination to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, the State Board of Equalization, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Finance, and the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) This article, except for Section 14199.92
 to the extent not in conflict with federal law, shall cease to be operative for any affected tax period or periods upon a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction, or a final determination by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that the tax assessed pursuant to this article cannot be implemented for the affected tax period or periods, and any amount of the tax paid under this article with respect to the affected tax period or periods shall be refunded. The director shall post a notification of that final judicial or federal administrative determination on the department’s internet website and shall provide this notification to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Legislative Counsel, the State Board of Equalization, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Finance, and the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) Notwithstanding this section, any tax and any applicable interest and penalties imposed under this article shall continue to be due and payable to the department until the tax and any applicable interest and penalties are fully paid.

(e) Upon execution of the declaration described in subdivision (b) or (c), the director shall implement a plan, in consultation with the Department of Finance, to end the program consistent with the purpose of the article, including the recoupment of payments made under this article if required by a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination made by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 14199.97.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 14199.97.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.97.

(a) This article shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or the date on which the act that added this article is chaptered, whichever is later.

(b) (1) All sections in this article, except for Section 14199.92 to the extent not in conflict with federal law, shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031, or on a date as specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 14199.96, whichever occurs first. All sections in this article, except for Section 14199.92, are repealed on January 1, 2032.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any tax and any applicable interest and penalties imposed under this article shall continue to be due and payable to the department
 until the tax and any applicable interest and penalties are fully paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (SB 125)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 7.2, commencing with Section 14199.90, except Section 14199.92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Protect Access to Health Care Act of 2024  [14199.100. - 14199.136.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title, Findings and Declarations, Statement of Purpose  [14199.100. - 14199.102.]

14199.100.

Title

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Protect Access to Health Care Act of 2024.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.101.

Findings and Declarations 

The people of the State of California find and declare all of the following: 

(a) In 2019, Governor Newsom and the Legislature embarked on a series of investments and initiatives to improve the health care delivery system in California. These actions included extending health care coverage to all low-income Californians, starting California’s own generic drug production to deliver low-cost insulin to patients, providing much-needed mental health services to all California schoolchildren, and initiating a multiyear commitment to the improvement of the Medi-Cal program.

(b) While these past several years have seen significant
 investment and initial outcomes appear to be successful, these investments are at risk in future years and need to be protected.

(c) About 2 out of every 5 Californians, between 12 million and 15 million people, rely on the Medi-Cal program for health care coverage. This includes approximately four million children and two million seniors and people with disabilities.

(d) However, just being enrolled in the Medi-Cal program does not guarantee access to quality health care. Most Medi-Cal reimbursement rates have not been adjusted in more than a decade, and some providers have not seen a payment increase in over 25 years. As a result, doctors and other health care providers struggle to take on new Medi-Cal patients. Relatedly, Medi-Cal patients, and in some areas entire communities, face a loss of access to critical and emergency care as essential hospital services such as labor and
 delivery are at risk of being reduced or eliminated.

(e) The problem is exacerbated by a shortage of health care professionals in our state. The current strains on our health care system have left many health care workers physically and mentally exhausted, and thousands have left the profession altogether. This has left our health care system overstretched and made it even harder for the most vulnerable Californians to get access to care, including access to family planning services and other reproductive health care.

(f) Medi-Cal patients may wait weeks or months to see doctors who are specialists. The situation is more challenging in rural areas of the state that have fewer primary care providers per person, which results in delays or inability to access basic health care services.

(g) Obtaining adequate mental
 health services can take even longer. California suffers not only from a shortage of mental health care professionals, but also from a shortage of psychiatric beds and treatment for patients with serious mental health conditions. When patients with serious mental health needs cannot obtain adequate care, they frequently wait days in the emergency room or may ultimately be left untreated and become homeless.

(h) All Californians continue to struggle with high prescription drug prices. When Californians cannot access the medications they need, our entire health care system suffers.

(i) The lack of health care access and affordable prescription drugs for patients poses a health care risk for all Californians. When Medi-Cal patients are unable to refill a prescription or find a doctor, mental health facility, or other health care provider to treat them, they often end up in emergency
 rooms. This puts additional, and avoidable, strains on our state’s emergency rooms. When Medi-Cal patients are forced to rely on emergency rooms as their primary source of health care, the additional strain makes it harder for all patients to obtain life-saving care.

(j) Medi-Cal patients need the same access to health care and prescription medications as patients with private or employer-based health insurance. This is best and most directly accomplished by increasing reimbursement rates for doctors, hospitals, and other health care providers that treat Medi-Cal patients to at least cover the costs of providing care and by bringing down the cost of prescription drugs.

(k) California is one of several states that levy taxes on managed care plans to obtain extra federal dollars to help pay for health care access. This chapter addresses many of the current flaws in Medi-Cal funding.
 First, it ensures the existing tax is continued permanently so that California obtains its fair share of federal health care funding. Second, it guarantees that all of the revenue from the continued tax will be spent on investments to improve access to critical health care services and makes it impossible to divert these dollars to unrelated uses.

(l) In addition, this chapter helps make essential medications affordable and accessible to more patients by increasing funding for the state to produce and distribute generic prescription drugs. By expanding California’s capacity to produce its own generic prescription drugs, this chapter will inject competition into the prescription drug market and help address critical drug shortages. This will reduce prescription drug prices for all Californians.

(m) By ensuring permanent funding for increased Medi-Cal provider payments, generic
 prescription drug programs, and increasing our health care workforce, bed capacity, and treatment options, and protecting these dollars from unauthorized uses, this chapter will improve our overall health care system by providing all patients with greater access to quality health care and affordable drugs.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.102.

Statement of Purpose 

In enacting this chapter, the purpose and intent of the people of the State of California is to do all of the following:

(a) Increase access to quality health care by establishing a permanent, dedicated funding stream to be used for increasing reimbursement rates and other supports to health care providers that treat Medi-Cal patients and investments in building an adequate health care workforce, bed capacity, and treatment options.

(b) Increase access to affordable prescription drugs by establishing a permanent, dedicated funding stream to be used to produce and distribute generic prescription drugs through the California Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act of 2020.

(c) Prevent the revenue stream permanently continued by this chapter from ever being used to fund unauthorized or unrelated programs or from being used to supplant or replace existing sources of moneys that currently fund health care access and affordable prescription drug programs in this state.

(d) Continue a dedicated funding stream that is fully permitted by federal law, while also ensuring that taxpayers and employers do not bear the financial burden for the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Protect Access to Health Care Fund  [14199.103. - 14199.107.]

14199.103.

Creation of the Protect Access to Health Care Fund

(a) (1) The Protect Access to Health Care Fund (fund) is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law:

(A) The fund is a special fund, permanently separate and apart from the General Fund or any other state fund or account.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, any interest or dividends earned on moneys in the fund shall be retained in the fund and used solely as set forth in this chapter.

(b) The Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund is hereby established in the fund.

(c) The Improving Access to Health Care Subfund is hereby established in the fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law:

(1) (A) Effective January 1, 2027, any remaining moneys in the Managed Care Enrollment Fund created pursuant to Section 14199.82 that are not necessary to fund liabilities or encumbrances to support the subcomponents of the Medi-Cal program set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 14199.82 for expenditures associated with the 2023, 2024, 2025, and 2026 payments shall be transferred to the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account.

(B) Effective on the date on which all remaining encumbered moneys in the Managed Care
 Enrollment Fund have been exhausted, the Managed Care Enrollment Fund is hereby abolished, and Section 14199.82 shall become inoperative, and is hereby repealed one year after becoming inoperative.

(2) (A) Effective January 1, 2027, any remaining moneys in the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund created pursuant to Section 14105.200 that are not necessary to fund liabilities or encumbrances for the purposes set forth in Section 14105.200 for expenditures associated with the 2023, 2024, 2025, and 2026 calendar years shall be transferred to the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account.

(B) Effective on the date on which all remaining encumbered moneys in the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund have been exhausted, the Medi-Cal Provider Payment Reserve Fund is hereby abolished, and Section 14105.200 shall become inoperative, and is hereby repealed one year
 after becoming inoperative.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.104.

Fund Oversight and Accountability

(a) The people of the State of California hereby declare their unqualified intent for the moneys deposited into the fund to be used to support the purposes set forth in this chapter without delay or interruption. The purpose of this section is to provide oversight and accountability mechanisms to guarantee that the people’s intent is carried out.

(b) (1) Every four years, the Controller shall conduct an independent financial audit of the programs receiving moneys from the fund. The Controller shall report the findings to the Governor and both houses of the Legislature, and shall make the findings available to the public on its internet
 website.

(2) The Controller’s audit shall also assess the department’s annual compliance with Section 14199.107.

(c) (1) The Controller shall be separately reimbursed from moneys in the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund for actual costs incurred in conducting the financial audit required by subdivision (b) of this section and the reviews required by subdivision (b) of Section 14199.107 in an amount not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per audit and review.

(2) The seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per audit and review maximum limit shall be adjusted decennially to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U). The Treasurer’s office shall calculate and publish the adjustments
 required by this paragraph.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.105.

Treatment of Moneys Deposited in and Expended from the Fund

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) The fund, and every subfund, account, and subaccount within the fund, is hereby declared to be a trust fund, trust subfund, trust account, or trust subaccount.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code as those sections read on January 1, 2023, moneys in the fund shall not be borrowed, loaned, or otherwise transferred to the General Fund or any other state or local fund or account. Moneys deposited into the fund, and any subfund, account, or subaccount within the fund, including any interest or dividends earned thereon, shall
 only be used for the specific purposes set forth in this chapter. Action shall not be taken that permanently or temporarily changes the status of the fund or any subfund, account, or subaccount within the fund as a trust fund, trust subfund, trust account, or trust subaccount, or borrows, diverts, or appropriates the moneys in the fund in a manner inconsistent with this chapter.

(c) (1) The taxes imposed by Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7 during calendar years 2025 and 2026, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 14199.123) and the moneys derived therefrom, including interest and penalties but less payment of refunds, are required to be deposited into the fund as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 14199.108). The fund is a special fund and trust fund permanently and irrevocably separate and apart from the General Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in
 the fund are continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal year for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(2) (A) Therefore, the taxes and the moneys resulting therefrom described in paragraph (1) shall not be considered to be part of the General Fund, as that term is used in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 16300) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, shall not be considered General Fund revenues for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and its implementing statutes, and shall not be considered “General Fund revenues,” “state revenues,” “moneys,” or “General Fund proceeds of taxes” for purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and its implementing statutes.

(B) This paragraph does not change the character of the taxes and the
 moneys resulting therefrom described in paragraph (1) as “state revenues” or “state tax revenues” for purposes of Title XIX and Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.106.

Administration

(a) (1) The department shall be annually reimbursed from moneys in the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund for actual and necessary costs incurred in administering this chapter in an amount not to exceed 0.0005 percent of the moneys annually deposited into the fund or four million dollars ($4,000,000), whichever is greater. Any interagency agreements entered into by the department for administration of this chapter shall be covered by the amount provided in this subdivision.

(2) The limit in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted decennially to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U).
 The Treasurer’s office shall calculate and publish the adjustments required by this paragraph.

(b) (1) (A) On and after January 1, 2027, the department has a nondiscretionary ministerial duty to use all of the moneys in the fund, and each subfund, account, and subaccount within the fund, to accomplish the purposes of this chapter on an annual basis. Therefore, on and after January 1, 2027, the department shall make every reasonable effort to exhaust or otherwise encumber all of the moneys in the fund by the end of each calendar year or fiscal year.

(B) The department may choose to comply with this requirement on a calendar year or fiscal year basis and may account for such expenditures on an accrual or cash basis. The department shall publish its choices under this subparagraph on its internet website.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, unexhausted moneys in the fund that are allocated for expenditures associated with payments to Medi-Cal providers pursuant to a federally approved methodology, or a methodology for which federal approval is pending, shall be considered otherwise encumbered at the end of each applicable calendar year or fiscal year.

(2) In any challenge alleging that the department is violating this nondiscretionary ministerial duty, the court shall apply its independent judgment and deference shall not be accorded to the department.

(c) (1) If, in any challenge brought to remedy a violation of this chapter, a restraining order or preliminary injunction is issued, the plaintiffs or petitioners shall not be required to post a bond obligating the plaintiffs or petitioners to
 indemnify the government defendants or the State of California for any damage the restraining order or preliminary injunction may cause.

(2) (A) If any challenge to invalidate an action that violates this chapter is successful by way of a final judgment issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, then an amount of moneys necessary to restore the fund, subfund, account, or subaccount from which the moneys were unlawfully taken or diverted to its financial status had the unlawful action not been taken shall be transferred from the General Fund to the fund, subfund, account, or subaccount, as applicable, upon appropriation by the Legislature. Interest calculated at the Pooled Money Investment Fund rate from the date or dates the moneys were unlawfully taken or diverted shall accrue to the amounts required to be transferred pursuant to this paragraph. Within 30 calendar days of the appropriation made by the Legislature, the
 Controller shall make the transfer required by this paragraph and issue a notice to the parties, the department, and the committee that the transfer has been completed.

(B) If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient moneys to satisfy a final judgment described in subparagraph (A) within 365 days of the issuance of that judgment, the court shall direct the Controller to use moneys in the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account to restore the moneys that were unlawfully taken or diverted, including interest.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.107.

Nonsupplantation

(a) (1) Except as otherwise specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109), moneys in the fund shall not be used to replace or supplant state revenue sources already in existence before the effective date of this chapter. Moneys in the fund shall only be used to expand the health care benefits, health care services, health care workforce, and payment rates above and beyond those already in effect or in existence as of January 1, 2024.
